Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,120
Personalized message license plates; delivery.

Until January 1, 2019, when the department approves an application for personalized message license plates, it shall notify the applicant and deliver the license plates to the county treasurer of the county in which the motor vehicle or trailer is to be registered. Beginning January 1, 2019, when the department approves an application for personalized message license plates, the department shall notify the applicant and deliver the license plates and registration certificate to the applicant by United States mail or to the county treasurer of the county in which the motor vehicle or trailer is to be registered and the delivery of the plates and registration certificate shall be made through a secure process and system. The county treasurer or the department shall deliver such plates to the applicant, in lieu of regular license plates, when the applicant complies with the other provisions of law for registration of the motor vehicle or trailer.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 120;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 73;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 40.